en: Certified by AENOR
ca: Certificat per AENOR
es: Certificado por l'Asociación Española de Normalización y Certificación
fi: AENOR:in sertifioima
fr: Certifié par l'AENOR
pt: Certificado pela AENOR

en: ProTerra
xx: ProTerra

en: Non-vegetarian, not vegetarian, not suitable for vegetarians
de: Nicht-vegetarisch, nicht für Vegetarier geeignet
fi: ei-vegetaarinen, ei sovellu kasvissyöjille
fr: Non végétarien, ne convient pas aux végétariens
hu: Nem vegetáriánus
it: Non vegetariano, non adatto ai vegetariani
nl: niet geschikt voor vegetariërs
pt: Não-vegetariano, não vegetariano, não adequado para vegetarianos

en: Not advised for specific people, Not recommended
ca: No recomanat a persones específiques, No recomanat
de: Nicht empfohlen für bestimmte Personengruppen
es: No recomendado para ciertas personas
fi: ei suositella tietyille henkilöille, ei suositella
fr: Déconseillé à certaines catégories de personnes
he: לא מומלץ לאנשים מסוימים
hr: nije preporučljivo za određene osobe
hu: Nem ajánlott bizonyos emberek számára, Nem ajánlott, nem javasolt, ellenjavallt
it: Non raccomandato per persone specifiche
nl: Niet aanbevolen voor specifieke mensen
pt: Não recomendado para pessoas específicas, não recomendado

en: Not advised for pregnant women, not recommended for pregnant women
bg: Не се препоръчва за бременни жени
ca: No recomanat per embarassades
da: Ikke anbefalet til gravide
de: Für Schwangere ungeeignet
es: Desaconsejado para embarazadas, No aconsejado para embarazadas, No aconsejado para mujeres embarazadas, Desaconsejado para mujeres embarazadas, No recomendado para embarazadas, No recomendado para mujeres embarazadas, No recomendado para mujeres embarazadas
fi: Ei suositella raskauden aikana
fr: Non recommandé aux femmes enceintes, non conseillé aux femmes enceintes, Déconseillé aux femmes enceintes
hr: Nije preporučljivo za trudnice
hu: Nem ajánlott várandós nők számára, Nem ajánlott terhes nők számára, várandós nők számára nem ajánlott
it: Non consigliato per le donne in gravidanza, non raccomandato per le donne in gravidanza
nl: Niet aanbevolen voor zwangere vrouwen
pt: Não recomendado para mulheres grávidas, não aconselhado para mulheres grávidas, não recomendado a mulheres grávidas, não aconselhado a mulheres grávidas, Desaconselhado a mulheses grávidas, desaconselhado para mulheres grávidas
ru: Не рекомендовано для беременных женщин
se: Recommanderas ej till gravida
sv: Rekommanderas ej till gravida
th: ไม่แนะนำสำหรับคนท้อง

en: Not advised for children and pregnant women
bg: Не се препоръчва за деца и бременни жени
de: Für Schwangere und Kinder nicht empfohlen
es: No recomendado para niños o mujeres embarazadas
fi: Ei suositella lapsille tai raskauden aikana
fr: Déconseillé aux enfants et aux femmes enceintes
hu: Nem ajánlott gyerekek és várandós nők számára, gyerekek és várandós nők számára nem ajánlott
it: Sconsigliato per bambini e donne in gravidanza
nl: Afgeraden voor kinderen en zwangere vrouwen
pt: Não recomendado para crianças e mulheres grávidas, não recomendado a crianças e mulheres grávidas
ru: Не рекомендовано для детей и беременных женщин
se: Rekommenderas ej till barn samt gravida
sv: Rekommenderas ej till barn samt gravida

en: Not advised for children and pregnant or breastfeeding people, Not recommended for children and pregnant or breastfeeding women
sv: Rekommenderas ej för barn och gravida eller ammande personer, Rekommenderas ej för barn och gravida eller ammande kvinnor

en: Not recommended for children under 3 years
ca: No recomanat per infants menors de 3 anys
da: Ikke anbefalet til børn under 3 år
de: Für Kinder unter 3 Jahren nicht empfohlen
es: No recomendado a niños menores de 3 años, No recomendado consumo a menores de 3 años
fi: ei suositella alle 3-vuotiaille
fr: Déconseillé aux enfants de moins de 3 ans
hu: Nem ajánlott 3 éves kor alatt, 3 éves kor alatti gyerekek számára nem ajánlott
it: Sconsigliato a bambini al di sotto dei 3 anni
nl: Niet aanbevolen voor kinder jonger dan 3 jaar
pt: Não recomendado para crianças com menos de 3 anos, não recomendado a crianças com menos de 3 anos, não recomendado para crianças com idade inferior a 3 anos, não recomendado a crianças com idade inferior a 3 anos
ru: Не рекомендовано для детей младше 3 лет
th: ไม่แนะนำสำหรับเด็กอายุต่ำกว่า 3 ปี

en: Not suited for children under 1 years
de: Nicht geeignet für Kinder unter 1 Jahr
es: No apto para niños menores de 1 año
fr: Non adapté aux enfants de moins de 1 an
it: Non adatto ai bambini sotto l'anno di età
nl: Niet geschikt voor kinderen onder 1 jaar
pt: Não adequado para crianças menores de 1 ano

en: Organic, organically grown, organically produced, ingredient produced organically, from organic farming, From Organic Agriculture, organic ingredients, from controlled organic agriculture, from organic controlled cultivation
bg: Био, биологично земеделие, биологично
ca: Orgànic, de cultiu ecologic, ecològica, d'agricultura ecològica
cs: Bio, z kontrolovane ekologicke produkce, z ekologickeho, z kontrolovaného ekologického zemědělství
cz: z ekologického zemědělství, z kontrolované ekologické produkce
da: Økologisk, Økologiske, certificeret økologisk
de: Bio, Öko, biologisch, biologische, biologischer, biologisches, Ökologisch, Kontrolliert biologisch, Kontrolliert ökologisch, biologische Landwirtschaft, aus biologischer Landwirtschaft, ökologische Landwirtschaft, biologischer Landbau, ökologischer Landbau, aus kontrolliert biologischem Anbau, biologisch gewonnen, aus kontrolliert biologischer landwirtschaft, aus kontrolliert ökologischer erzeugung, aus kontrolliert ökologischer landwirtschaft, aus kontrolliert ökologischem anbau, aus kontrolliert ökologischem landbau, aus kontrollierter biologischer landwirtschaft, aus kontrollierter ökologischer landwirtschaft, kontrolliert biologischer anbau, biologisch zertifiziert
es: Ecológico, ecológica, Producto ecológico, Biológico, Producto biológico, orgánica, orgánicas, orgánico, orgánicos, Producto orgánico, Eco, Bio, Ingredientes ecológicos, Ingrediente ecológico, ingredientes procedentes de la agricultura ecológica, ingrediente procedente de la agricultura ecológica, agricultura ecológica, cumple con el reglamento de agricultura ecológica CE 2092/91, procedentes de la agricultura ecológica, procedente de la agricultura ecológica, de agricultura ecológica, de agricultura ecologica, Procedente e agricultura ecológica, de cultivo ecológico
fi: Luomu, luomutuotanto, luomutuotantoa, luomuraaka-aine, luonnonmukainen tuotanto, luonnonmukaisesti, sertifioitu luomutuote, luomutuote
fr: Bio, agriculture biologique, biologique, organic, organique, issu de l'agriculture biologique, issus de l'agriculture biologique, issus de l'agriculture biologique contrôlée, issue de l'agriculture biologique, issues de l'agriculture biologique, ingrédient issu de l'agriculture biologique, ingrédients issus de l'agriculture biologique, Les-ingredients-sont-issus-d-une-agriculture-biologique, ingrédients agricoles issus de l'agriculture biologique, produits issus de l'agriculture biologique, produit issu de l'agriculture biologique, ingrédient agricole issu de l'agriculture biologique, tous les ingrédients agricoles sont issus de l'agriculture biologique, les ingrédients agricoles sont issus de l'agriculture biologique, tous les ingrédients sont issus de l'agriculture biologique, ingrédients bio, ingrédients biologiques, ingrédient bio, ingrédient biologique, issue de l'agriculture biologique controlee, issu de production biologique
he: אורגני
hr: ekološki uzgoj, iz ekološkog uzgoja, iz kontroliranog ekološkog uzgoja, iz kontrolirane ekološke proizvodnje, iz kontroliranog biološkog uzgoja, iz kontroliranog organskog uzgoja, iz biološkog uzgoja, ekološki, organsko, organska
hu: Bio, Öko, Organikus, biogazdálkodásból, ellenőrzött ökológiai gazdálkodásból
it: Biologico, biologici, biologiche, da agricoltura biologica
ja: 有機
ko: 유기농
lt: Ekologiškas, ekologiškai užaugintas, ekologiškai pagamintas, ingredientas pagamintas ekologiškai, iš ekologiško žemės ūkio, iš ekologiško žemės ūkio
nb: Økologisk, certificeret økologisk
nl: Biologisch, biologische, bio, van biologische oorsprong, van biologische teelt, van gecontroleerd biologische teelt, afkomstig van biologische productiemethode, van gecontroleerde biologische landbouw
pl: ekologiczny, bio, ekologiczne, ekologiczna, ekologicznych, ekologicznego, z kontrolowanych upraw ekologicznych, z kontrolowanej produkcji ekologicznej, z kontrolowanego rolnictwa ekologicznego, certyfikowany składnik ekologiczny, składnik ekologiczny, produkt pochodzący z kontrolowanych certyfikowanych upraw ekologicznych
pt: Orgânico, produção orgânica, produzido de forma orgânica, numa quinta orgânica, de agricultura orgânica, agricultura orgânica, de produção Biológica
ro: din agricultură ecologică controlată, din cultură organică controlată
sk: z kontrolovaného ekologického poľnohospodárstva, produkt ekologického poľnohospodárstva
sl: iz kontrolirane ekološke pridelave
sv: Ekologisk, ekologiskt, ekologiska, certifierad ekologisk, kontrollerat ekologiskt jordbruk, ekologisk ingrediens, ekologisk råvara, ekologiskt odlat, ekologiskt odlade
th: ออร์แกนิค
tr: Organik
zh: 有机

en: Non-organic, not organic
ca: No ecològic
da: Ikke-økologisk
de: Nicht Bio, nicht-bio, nichtbio
fr: Non-bio
hu: Nem bio
it: Non organico
pt: Não-orgânico, não orgânico

en: Fair-Trade Organic, Fair-Trade and Organic
de: Fair Trade organisch
es: Comercio justo y orgánico
fi: Reilu kauppa ja luomu
fr: Commerce équitable Bio, Commerce équitable et Bio, Issus du commerce équitable et de l'agriculture biologique, Issus de l'agriculture biologique et du commerce équitable
pt: Comércio justo e orgânico

en: Biodynamic agriculture
ca: Agricultura biodinàmica
de: Biodynamische Landwirtschaft, Biodynamisch, Biodynamische, Biodynamischer, Biodynamisches
es: Agricultura biodinámica
fi: biodynaaminen maatalous
fr: Bio-dynamie, biodynamie, agriculture biodynamique, agriculture bio-dynamique, bio-dynamique
he: חקלאות ביודינמית, חקלאות ביודינאמית
it: Agricoltura biodinamica
nl: Biodynamische landbouw
pl: Rolnictwo biodynamiczne
pt: Agricultura biodinâmica

en: Demeter
xx: Demeter
fr: Demeter, Association Demeter, Demeter France, Association Demeter France
it: Demetra

en: Biodyvin
ca: Vi biodinàmic

en: NPOP-NAB-0001
xx: NPOP-NAB-0001

en: NPOP-NAB-0002
xx: NPOP-NAB-0002

en: NPOP-NAB-0003
xx: NPOP-NAB-0003

en: NPOP-NAB-0004
xx: NPOP-NAB-0004

en: NPOP-NAB-0006
xx: NPOP-NAB-0006